District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4117

Applicability.

Repealed.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 18, 44 DCR 1232
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-270, § 2, 46 DCR 1111
July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 19, 47 DCR 797

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-1117.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Temporary amendment of section: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-197 added (c).
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 12-197 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Sections 2 to 18 of D.C. Laws 13-110 added the Sex Offender Temporary Act of 1999, designated as sections 24-1121 to 24-1137 1981 Ed. .
Section 219(b) of D.C. Laws 13-110 provided: This act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1999, whichever occurs first.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-111, July 18, 1997, 44 DCR 4499),§ 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-150, September 29, 1997, 44 DCR 5767), § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-367, June 5, 1998, 45 DCR 4041), § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-477, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 8008), and § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-10, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2320).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-282, February 25, 1998, 45 DCR 1720), § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Immunity from Liability Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-365, June 5, 1998, 45 DCR 3880), and § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Immunity From Liability Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-540, December 24, 1998, 45 DCR 301).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Risk Assessment Clarification and Convention Center Marketing Service Contracts Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-427, July 29, 1998, 45 DCR 5725),§ 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Risk Assessment Clarification and Convention Center Marketing Service Contracts Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-508, November 4, 1998, 45 DCR 9174), and § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Risk Assessment Clarification and Convention Center Marketing Service Contracts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-9, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2317).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-133, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6771).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-176, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9244).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-229, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 487).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-308, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2714).